South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S813.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 8-13-1302(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) A candidate, committee, or ballot measure committee must maintain and preserve an account of: (1) the total amount of contributions accepted by the candidate, committee, or ballot measure committee; (2) the name and address of each person making a contribution and the amount and date of receipt of each contribution; (3) the total amount of expenditures made by or on behalf of the candidate, committee, or ballot measure committee; (4) the name and address of each person to whom an expenditure is made including the date, amount, purpose, and beneficiary of the expenditure; (5) all receipted bills, canceled checks, or other proof of payment for each expenditure; and (6) the occupation and employer of each person making a contribution. SECTION 2.  Section 8-13-1308(F) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (F) Certified campaign reports detailing campaign contributions and expenditures must contain: (1) the total of contributions accepted by the candidate or committee; (2) the name, and address, occupation, and employer of each person making a contribution of more than one hundred dollars and the amount and date of receipt of each contribution; (3) the total expenditures made by or on behalf of the candidate or committee; (4) the name and address of each person to whom an expenditure is made from campaign funds, including the date, amount, purpose, and beneficiary of the expenditure. SECTION 3.  Section 8-13-1309(E) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (E) Certified campaign reports detailing campaign contributions and expenditures must contain: (1) the total amount of contributions accepted by the ballot measure committee; (2) the name, and address, occupation, and employer of each person making a contribution of more than one hundred dollars and the amount and date of receipt of each contribution; (3) the total amount of expenditures made by or on behalf of the ballot measure committee; and (4) the name and address of each person to whom an expenditure is made from campaign funds, including the date, amount, purpose, and beneficiary of the expenditure. SECTION 4.  Section 8-13-1314(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) Within an election cycle, a candidate or anyone acting on his behalf shall not solicit or accept, and a person shall not give or offer to give to a candidate or person acting on the candidate's behalf: (1) a contribution which exceeds: (a) three thousand five hundred dollars in the case of a candidate for statewide office; or (b) three thousand five hundred dollars in the aggregate for statewide candidates elected jointly pursuant to Section 8, Article IV of the South Carolina Constitution, 1895; or (c) one thousand dollars in the case of a candidate for any other office; (2) a cash contribution from an individual unless the cash contribution does not exceed twenty-five dollars and is accompanied by a record of the amount of the contribution and the name, and address, occupation, and employer of the contributor; (3) a contribution from, whether directly or indirectly, a registered lobbyist if that lobbyist engages in lobbying the public office or public body for which the candidate is seeking election; (4) contributions for two elective offices simultaneously, except as provided in Section 8-13-1318. SECTION 5.  Section 8-13-1360(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) The State Ethics Commission shall develop a contribution and expenditure reporting form which must include: (1) a designation as a pre-election or quarterly report and, if a pre-election report, the election date; (2) the candidate's name and address or, in the case of a committee, the name and address of the committee; (3) the balance of campaign accounts on hand at the beginning and at the close of the reporting period and the location of those campaign accounts; (4) the total amount of all contributions received during the reporting period; the total amount of contributions of one hundred dollars or less in the aggregate from one source received during the reporting period; and the name, and address, occupation, and employer of each person contributing more than one hundred dollars in the aggregate during the reporting period, the date and amount of the contribution, and the year-to-date total for each contributor. Written promises or pledges to make a contribution must be reported separately in the same manner as other monetary contributions; (5) the total amount of all loans received during the reporting period and the total amount of loans for the year to date. The report also must include the date and amount of each loan from one source during the reporting period, the name and address of each maker or guarantor of each loan, the year-to-date total of each maker or guarantor, and the terms of the loan, including the interest rate, repayment terms, loan payments, and existing balances on each loan; (6) the date and amount of any in-kind contributions of more than one hundred dollars in the aggregate by one person during the reporting period, and the contributor's name, address, occupation, employer, and year-to-date total; (7) the total amount of all refunds, rebates, interest, and other receipts not previously identified during the reporting period, and their year-to-date total; the total amount of other receipts received of one hundred dollars or less in the aggregate from one source during the reporting period; the date and amount of each refund, rebate, interest, or other receipt not previously identified of more than one hundred dollars in the aggregate from one source, the name and address and the year-to-date total for each source; (8) the aggregate total of all contributions, loans, and other receipts during the reporting period and the year-to-date total; the amount, date, and a brief description of each expenditure made during the reporting period, the name and address of the entity to which the expenditure was made, and the year-to-date total of expenditures to that entity. Credit card expenses and candidate reimbursements must be itemized so that the purpose and recipient of the expenditure are identified; (9) the total amount of all loans made during the reporting period and the year-to-date total. The report also must include the date and amount of each loan to one entity during the reporting period, the name and address of each recipient of the loan, and the terms of the loan, including the interest rate, repayment terms, purpose of the loan, the year-to-date total, and existing balances. SECTION 6.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----